Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2602HV (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 949 Section 1. Section 47.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. a. Except for legal services and printing of ballots, 3 the commissioner shall take bids for goods and services which 4 that are needed in connection with registration of voters or 5 preparation for or administration of elections and which that 6 will be performed or provided by persons who are not employees 7 of the commissioner under the following circumstances: 8 a. (1) In any case where when it is proposed to purchase 9 data processing services. The commissioner shall give the 10 registrar written notice in advance on each occasion when it 11 is proposed to have data processing services, necessary in 12 connection with the administration of elections, performed 13 by any person other than the registrar or an employee of the 14 county. Such notice shall be made at least thirty days prior 15 to publication of the specifications. 16 b. (2) In all other cases, where the cost of the goods or 17 services to be purchased will exceed one thousand dollars For 18 the purchase of goods or services when the anticipated cost of 19 the goods or services exceeds fifty thousand dollars . 20 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , if the anticipated cost 21 of goods or services to be purchased by the commissioner is 22 equal to or less than fifty thousand dollars, the commissioner 23 may use an informal bid process to solicit written bids from 24 at least three qualified contractors that either sell the 25 needed goods or provide the needed services in accordance with 26 applicable local, state, or federal law. 27 Sec. 2. Section 64.24, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 1. a. The secretary of state, each county auditor, each 30 district court clerk, and each auditor or clerk of a city shall 31 keep a book, to be known as the âRecord of Official Bondsâ , 32 and all official bonds shall be recorded therein in full as 33 follows: 34 (1) a. In the record kept by the secretary of state, the 35 -1- LSB 2602HV (3) 91 ll/js 1/ 3 H.F. 949 official bonds of all state officers, elective or appointive, 1 except the bonds of notaries public. 2 (2) b. In the record kept by the county auditor, the 3 official bonds of all county officers, elective or appointive, 4 and township clerks. 5 (3) c. In the record kept by the city auditor or clerk, the 6 official bonds of all city officers, elective or appointive. 7 (4) d. In the record kept by the district court clerk, the 8 official bonds of judicial magistrates. 9 b. The records shall have an index which, under the title of 10 each office, shall show the name of each principal and the date 11 of the filing of the bond. 12 Sec. 3. Section 64.24, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2025, 13 is amended by striking the paragraph. 14 Sec. 4. Section 331.502, subsections 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 15 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 30, 35, and 36, Code 2025, are amended by 16 striking the subsections. 17 Sec. 5. Section 331.508, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, are 18 amended by striking the subsections. 19